Illinois, session 104th, SB1178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Brownfield and grayfield tax credit incentive 8program.9    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2025 10and ending on or before December 31, 2028, each taxpayer that 11is a developer and that invests in a qualified project 12redeveloping a brownfield or a grayfield may apply to the 13Department to receive a credit against the taxes imposed by 14subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201. If the redevelopment 15is to a brownfield, the amount of the credit is equal to 10% of 16up to $1,000,000 of the rehabilitation costs incurred by the 17taxpayer after remediation has occurred. If the redevelopment 18is to a grayfield, the amount of the credit is equal to 5% of 19up to $1,000,000 of the rehabilitation costs incurred by the 20taxpayer after remediation has occurred. The Department may 21not issue more than $20,000,000 in credits under this Section 22for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2025 and 23ending on or before December 31, 2028.   SB1178- 2 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (b) If a municipality or a county is the developer of the 2project, then the Department shall award the municipality or 3county the amount of the credit under this Section in the form 4of a grant from the General Revenue Fund. 5    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 6the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 7the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 8may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 95 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 10credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 11a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 12that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 13shall be applied first. 14    (d) If the taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S 15corporation, the credit is allowed to pass through to the 16partners and shareholders as provided in Section 251. Credits 17may also be transferred during the 5 taxable years after the 18taxable year in which the credit is claimed. 19    (e) The Department shall determine whether a project 20qualifies for the credit under this Section. The criteria that 21shall be used in making that determination are: 22        (1) the total amount of the developer's investment in 23    the project; 24        (2) the number of projected jobs or housing units 25    created by the project; 26        (3) the community impact of the planned   SB1178- 3 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    revitalization; and 2        (4) the cost-efficiency of the project. 3    In addition, the Department shall give enhanced 4consideration to projects that provide middle-income housing 5as part of the project. 6    Receipt of other credits or incentives shall not count 7against applicants when determining qualifying projects. 8    (f) The Department shall adopt rules to implement and 9administer this Section, including rules concerning 10applications for the tax credit. A taxpayer claiming the 11credit provided by this Section must maintain and record any 12information that the Department requires regarding the project 13for which the credit is claimed. 14    (g) As used in this Section: 15    "Brownfield" means a former industrial or commercial site 16where future use is affected by real or perceived 17environmental contamination. 18    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 19Opportunity. 20    "Developer" means a for-profit developer, a nonprofit 21developer, a land bank, a municipality, or a county. 22    "Grayfield" means commercial buildings that have been 23vacant for a minimum of 12 consecutive months. "Grayfield" 24includes vacant shopping malls and surrounding parking lots. 25    "Household" means all persons using the premises as their 26principal place of residence upon the sale or lease of the   SB1178- 4 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1middle-income housing by the developer. 2    "Household income" means the combined federal adjusted 3gross income of the members of the household for the taxable 4year immediately preceding the year in which the middle-income 5housing is sold or rented to the members of the household. 6    "Middle-income housing" means housing that is sold or 7rented to pursuant to a contract with a term of one year or 8longer to one or more individuals with a combined household 9income that exceeds 80% of the median household income in 10Illinois but does not exceed 120% of the median household 11income in Illinois.  12    Section 10. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 133-5 as follows: 14    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)15    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 162025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 17personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:18    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 19society, association, foundation, institution, or 20organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 21organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 22for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 23personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 24purpose of resale by the enterprise.  SB1178- 5 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 2Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 3operating, or promoting the county fair.4    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 5or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 6by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 7under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 8is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 9support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 10services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 11music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 12orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 13organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 14and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 15effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 16otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 17purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 18by the Department.19    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 20property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 21society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 22operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 23purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 24association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 25no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 26operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of   SB1178- 6 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 2exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 3company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 4purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 5otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 6purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 7number issued by the Department.8    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 9replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 10the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.11    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 122004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 13equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 14and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 15certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 16arts production, and including machinery and equipment 17purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 18acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 19acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 20a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 21arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 22and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 23paragraph (18). 24    (7) Farm chemicals.25    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 26coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the   SB1178- 7 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1United States of America, or the government of any foreign 2country, and bullion.3    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 4student organization affiliated with an elementary or 5secondary school located in Illinois.6    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 7as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax 8Act.9    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 10including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 11purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 12State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 13replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 14machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 15implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 16Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 17chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 18to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 19Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 20registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 21polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 22overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 23equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 24tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 25motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 26on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price   SB1178- 8 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1of the tender is separately stated.2    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 3farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 4installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 5limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 6or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 7limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 8software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 9such equipment.10    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 11sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 12computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 13facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 14to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 15crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 16agricultural chemicals. 17    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 18also includes electrical power generation equipment used 19primarily for production agriculture. 20    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 213-90.22    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 24to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 25conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 26destined for or returning from a location or locations outside   SB1178- 9 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 2domestic stopovers.3    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 4to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 5used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 6its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 7engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 8United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 9at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 10origination to the city of final destination on the same 11aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 12that aircraft. 13    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 14stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 15food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 16extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 17turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 18employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 19hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 20respect to which the service charge is imposed.21    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 22and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 23rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 24pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 25(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 26lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field   SB1178- 10 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 2machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 3motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 4Vehicle Code.5    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 6repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 7that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 8to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 9photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.10    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 11mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 12reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 13equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 14excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 15Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 16Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 17for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 18(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 19during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2016, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 21    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 22equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 23retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 24production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 25as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 26use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.  SB1178- 11 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 2used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 3tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 4lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 5manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 6used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 7person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as 8an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 9of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 10other similar items of no commercial value on special order 11for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 12paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 13property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 14July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 15does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 16generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 17the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 18wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 19through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 20water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 21customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 22of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 23meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 242017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 25but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 26as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section.   SB1178- 12 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 2purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 3that personal property was received by a florist located 4outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 5deliver the personal property.6    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 7for direct agricultural production.8    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 9meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 10Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 11Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 12Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 13racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 14provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 15under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 161995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 17January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 18beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 19    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 20any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 21analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 22lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 23longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 24otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 25hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 26identification number by the Department under Section 1g of   SB1178- 13 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 2in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 3in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 4the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 5the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 6at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 7collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 8that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 9this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 10tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 11collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 12have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 13lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 14for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 15Department.16    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 17the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 18in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 19the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 20been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 21number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 22Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 23does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 24non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 25imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 26may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the   SB1178- 14 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 2attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 3purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 4Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 5has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 6collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 7have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 8lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 9for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 10Department.11    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 12December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 13before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 14for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 15disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 16manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 17corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 18that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 19number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 20who reside within the declared disaster area.21    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 22December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 23before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 24the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 25including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 26access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems,   SB1178- 15 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 2purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 3facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 4State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 5Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 6in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 7disaster.8    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 9at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 10used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 11provisions of Section 3-90.12    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 131-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 14corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 15foundation, or institution that is determined by the 16Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 17educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 18corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 19foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 20for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 21schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 22useful branches of learning by methods common to public 23schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 24intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 25schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 26organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of   SB1178- 16 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 2individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 3technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 4occupation.5    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 6including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 7benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 8a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 9the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 10district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 11parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 12does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 13private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 14entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 15another individual or entity that sold the property for the 16purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 17from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 18exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.19    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 202001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 21serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 22other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 23Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 24and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 25amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 26paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the   SB1178- 17 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 2paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.3    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 4food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 5premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 6soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 7consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 8drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 9materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 10use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 11assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 12resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 13the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 14in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 15Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.16    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 17Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 18utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 19diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 20purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 21of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 22lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 23Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 24identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 25the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 26in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used   SB1178- 18 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 2the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 3the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 4at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 5collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 6that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 7this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 8tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 9collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 10have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 11lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 12for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 13Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 14Section 3-90.15    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 16Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 17who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 18executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 19subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 20that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 21identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 22the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 23in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 24any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 25tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 26case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at   SB1178- 19 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 2or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 3purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 4Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 5has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 6collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 7have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 8lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 9for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 10Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90.12    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 13the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 14with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 15are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 16Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 17July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 18of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 19vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 20subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 21Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 22are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 232005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 24added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 25that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 26the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this   SB1178- 20 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 2commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 3property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 4enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 5    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 6used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 7supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 8Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 9corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 10under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 11paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 13December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 14and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 15of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 16repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 17includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 18refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 19maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 20exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 21components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 22replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 23power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 24installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 25supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 26sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution,   SB1178- 21 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1latex gloves, and protective films. 2    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 331, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 4tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 5complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 6hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 7approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 8Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 9operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 10Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 11this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 12personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 13complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 14hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 15approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 16Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 17operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 18Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 19replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 20power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 21meet the qualifications of item (A). 22    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 23commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 24service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 25129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 26this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of   SB1178- 22 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 2exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 3January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 4for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 5the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 6and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 7101-629).8    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 9public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1011-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 11constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 12only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 13transferred to the municipality without any further 14consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 15of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 16retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 17instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 18connection with the development of the municipal convention 19hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 20corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 21Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 22of Section 3-90. 23    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 242026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 25    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 26Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify   SB1178- 23 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 2rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 3Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 4Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 5paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.6    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 7who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 8federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 9Section 3-90.10    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 11construction or operation of a data center that has been 12granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 13Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 14personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 15tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 16of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 17have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 181, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 19obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 20equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 21supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 22purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 23qualified. 24    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 25grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 26qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the   SB1178- 24 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 2Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 3    For the purposes of this item (40): 4        "Data center" means a building or a series of 5    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 6    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 7    the State of Illinois. 8        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 9    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 10    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 11    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 12    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 13    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 14    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 15    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 16    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 17    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 18    systems; other cabling; and other data center 19    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 20    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 21    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 22    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 23    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 24    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 25    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 26    personal property; and all other tangible personal   SB1178- 25 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 2    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 3    property" also includes building materials physically 4    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 5    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 6    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 7    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 8    Economic Opportunity. 9    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 103-90. 11    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 12collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 13item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 14used in this item (41): 15        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 16    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 17    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 18    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 19    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 20    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 21    time of sale. 22        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 23    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 24    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 25    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 26    milk until it is ready for consumption.   SB1178- 26 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 2    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 3    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 4    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 5    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 6    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 7    milk storage bags. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 9    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 10    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 11    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 12    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 13    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 14    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 15    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 16    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 17    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 18    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 19    or distributor. 20        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 21    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 22    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 23    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 24    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 25    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 26    manufacturer or distributor.   SB1178- 27 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 2the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 3Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90. 5    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 6property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 7forces of the United States who presents valid military 8identification and purchases the property using a form of 9payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 10of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 11prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 12transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 13paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 14the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 15years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 16States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 17Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 18Section 3-90. 19    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 20to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 21intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 22Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 23Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 24(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (45) (44) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 26in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be   SB1178- 28 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 2alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 3use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 4prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) (44) is 5exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 6    (46) (44) Use by the lessee of the following leased 7tangible personal property:8        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 9    meets the following requirements:10            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 11        by the licensor and the customer;12                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 13            customer accepts the license by means of an 14            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 15            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 16            the license will comply with this requirement;17                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 18            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 19            agree" does not comply with this requirement;20            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 21        use of the software;22            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 23        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 24        party (except to a related party) without the 25        permission and continued control of the licensor;26            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another   SB1178- 29 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 2        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 3        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 4        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 5        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 6        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 7        the licensor; and8            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 9        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 10        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 11        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 12        forth in the license agreement; and13        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 14    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 15    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 16    January 1, 2023. 17    (47) Tangible personal property that is (i) purchased by a 18developer who has been awarded a certificate of exemption 19under this paragraph (47) by the Department of Commerce and 20Economic Opportunity and (ii) used to rehabilitate brownfield 21or grayfield property, as defined in Section 246 of the 22Illinois Income Tax Act, after remediation has occurred. The 23Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall award 24certificates of exemption under this paragraph (47) for 25property that meets the criteria under this paragraph (47). 26This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.   SB1178- 30 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 2Section 70-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 75-5, 3eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 4Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, 5eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 77-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; revised 811-26-24.) 9    Section 15. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 10Section 3-5 as follows: 11    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)12    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 13personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:14    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 15society, association, foundation, institution, or 16organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 17organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 18for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 19personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 20purpose of resale by the enterprise.21    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 22county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 23promoting the county fair.24    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts   SB1178- 31 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 2by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 3under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 4is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 5support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 6services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 7music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 8orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 9organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 10and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 11effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 12otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 13purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 14by the Department.15    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 16coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 17United States of America, or the government of any foreign 18country, and bullion.19    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 202004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 21equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 22and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 23purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 24primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 25chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 26chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and   SB1178- 32 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 2July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 3in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 4exemption under Section 2 of this Act.5    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 6student organization affiliated with an elementary or 7secondary school located in Illinois.8    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 9including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 10purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 11State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 12replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 13machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 14implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 15Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 16chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 17to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 19registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 20polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 21overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 22equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 23tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 24motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 25on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 26of the tender is separately stated.  SB1178- 33 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 2farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 3installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 4limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 5or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 6limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 7software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 8such equipment.9    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 10sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 11computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 12facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 13to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 14crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 15agricultural chemicals. 16    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 17also includes electrical power generation equipment used 18primarily for production agriculture. 19    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 203-75.21    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 22to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 23to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 24conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 25destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 26the United States without regard to previous or subsequent   SB1178- 34 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1domestic stopovers.2    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 3to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 4used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 5its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 6engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 7United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 8at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 9origination to the city of final destination on the same 10aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 11that aircraft. 12    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 13stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 14food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 15service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 16the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 17substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 18in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 19beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 20imposed.21    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 22and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 23rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 24pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 25(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 26lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field   SB1178- 35 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 2machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 3motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 4Vehicle Code.5    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 6and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 7new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 9photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 10equipment purchased for lease.11    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 12mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 13reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 14equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 15excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 16Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 18for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 19(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 20during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2116, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).22    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 23for direct agricultural production.24    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 25meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 26Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter   SB1178- 36 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 2Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 3racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 5under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 61995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 7January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 8such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 9ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1095-88).11    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 12any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 13analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 14lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 15longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 16otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 17hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 18identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 19the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 20in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 21in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 22the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 23may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 24time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 25attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 26purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this   SB1178- 37 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 2been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 3such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 4right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 5however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 6reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 7Department.8    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 9the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 10in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 11the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 12been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 13the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 14Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 15qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 16manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 17this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 18fair market value of the property at the time the 19non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 20to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 21reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 22Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 23by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 24from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 25refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 26amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor   SB1178- 38 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1is liable to pay that amount to the Department.2    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 3December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 4before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 5for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 6disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 7manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 8corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 9that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 10number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 11who reside within the declared disaster area.12    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 13December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 14before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 15the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 16including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 17access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 18water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 19purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 20facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 21State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 22Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 23in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 24disaster.25    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 26at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is   SB1178- 39 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 2provisions of Section 3-75.3    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 41-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 5corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 6foundation, or institution that is determined by the 7Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 8educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 9corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 10foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 11for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 12schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 13useful branches of learning by methods common to public 14schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 15intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 16schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 17organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 18study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 19individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 20technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 21occupation.22    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 23including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 24benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 25a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 26the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school   SB1178- 40 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 2parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 3does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 4private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 5entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 6another individual or entity that sold the property for the 7purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 8from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 9exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.10    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 112001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 12serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 13other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 14Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 15and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 16amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 17paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 18commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 19paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.20    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 21food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 22premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 23soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 24consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 25drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 26materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human   SB1178- 41 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 2assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 3resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 4the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 5in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 6Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.7    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 8Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 9utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 10diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 11purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 12of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 13lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 14Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 15identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 16the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 17in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 18in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 19the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 20may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 21time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 22attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 23purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 24Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 25been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 26such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal   SB1178- 42 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 2however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 3reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 4Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 5Section 3-75.6    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 7Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 8who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 9executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 10subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 11that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 12number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 13Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 14does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 15nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 16imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 17based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 18nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 19to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 20reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 21Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 22by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 23from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 24refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 25amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 26is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph   SB1178- 43 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.2    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 3used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 4supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 5Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 6corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 7under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 8paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 9    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 10December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 11and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 12of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 13repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 14includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 15refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 16maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 17exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 18components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 19replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 20power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 21installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 22supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 23sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 24latex gloves, and protective films. 25    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying   SB1178- 44 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1tangible personal property transferred incident to the 2modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 3or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 4Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 5repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 6have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 7accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 8From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 9applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 10property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 12of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 13Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 14station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 15Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 16with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 17modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 18engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 19persons meet the qualifications of item (A).20    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 21commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 22service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 23129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 24this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 25existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 26exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from   SB1178- 45 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 2for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 3the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 4and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 5101-629).6    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 7public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 811-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 9constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 10only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 11transferred to the municipality without any further 12consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 13of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 14retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 15instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 16connection with the development of the municipal convention 17hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 18corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 19Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 20of Section 3-75. 21    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 222026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 23    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 24who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 25federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 26Section 3-75.   SB1178- 46 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 2construction or operation of a data center that has been 3granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 4Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 5personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 6tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 7of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 8have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 91, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 10obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 11equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 12supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 13purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 14qualified. 15    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 16grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 17qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 18Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 19Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 20    For the purposes of this item (31): 21        "Data center" means a building or a series of 22    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 23    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 24    the State of Illinois. 25        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 26    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and   SB1178- 47 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 2    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 3    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 4    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 5    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 6    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 7    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 8    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 9    systems; other cabling; and other data center 10    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 11    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 12    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 13    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 14    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 15    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 16    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 17    personal property; and all other tangible personal 18    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 19    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 20    property" also includes building materials physically 21    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 22    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 23    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 24    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 25    Economic Opportunity. 26    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section   SB1178- 48 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b13-75. 2    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 3collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 4item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 5used in this item (32): 6        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 7    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 8    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 9    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 10    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 11    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 12    time of sale. 13        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 14    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 15    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 16    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 17    milk until it is ready for consumption. 18        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 19    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 20    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 21    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 22    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 23    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 24    milk storage bags. 25        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 26    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the   SB1178- 49 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 2    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 3    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 4    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 5    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 6    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 7    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 8    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 9    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 10    or distributor. 11        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 12    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 13    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 14    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 15    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 16    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 17    manufacturer or distributor. 18    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 19the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 20Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 21Section 3-75. 22    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 23property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 24forces of the United States who presents valid military 25identification and purchases the property using a form of 26payment where the federal government is the payor. The member   SB1178- 50 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 2prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 3transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 4paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 5the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 6years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 7States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 8Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 9Section 3-75. 10    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 11to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 12intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 13Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 14Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 15paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 16    (36) (35) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 17in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 18transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 19or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 20the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 21Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 22Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 23Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969, or 24by an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life 25Care Facilities Act. This item (36) (35) is exempt from the 26provisions of Section 3-75.   SB1178- 51 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 2in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 3consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 4alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 5use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 6prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) (36) is 7exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 8    (38) (35) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 9personal property:10        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 11    meets the following requirements:12            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 13        by the licensor and the customer;14                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 15            customer accepts the license by means of an 16            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 17            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 18            the license will comply with this requirement;19                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 20            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 21            agree" does not comply with this requirement;22            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 23        use of the software;24            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 25        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 26        party (except to a related party) without the   SB1178- 52 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        permission and continued control of the licensor;2            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 3        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 4        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 5        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 6        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 7        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 8        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 9        the licensor; and10            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 11        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 12        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 13        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 14        forth in the license agreement; and15        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 16    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 17    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 18    January 1, 2023. 19    (39) Tangible personal property that is (i) purchased by a 20developer who has been awarded a certificate of exemption 21under this paragraph (39) by the Department of Commerce and 22Economic Opportunity and (ii) used to rehabilitate brownfield 23or grayfield property, as defined in Section 246 of the 24Illinois Income Tax Act, after remediation has occurred. The 25Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall award 26certificates of exemption under this paragraph (39) for   SB1178- 53 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1property that meets the criteria under this paragraph (39). 2This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 3(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 4Section 70-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 575-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 6Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, 7eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 8103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 97-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, 10eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 11    Section 20. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 12changing Section 3-5 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)14    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 15property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:16    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 18than a limited liability company, that is organized and 19operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 20benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 21property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 22of resale by the enterprise.23    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 24Illinois county fair association for use in conducting,   SB1178- 54 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1operating, or promoting the county fair.2    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 3or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 4by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 5under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 6is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 7support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 8services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 9music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 10orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 11organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 12and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 13effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 14otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 15purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 16by the Department.17    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 18coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 19United States of America, or the government of any foreign 20country, and bullion.21    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 222004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 23equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 24and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 25purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 26primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes   SB1178- 55 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 2chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 3immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 4July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 5in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 6exemption under Section 2 of this Act.7    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 8organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 9located in Illinois.10    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 11including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 12purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 13State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 14replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 15machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 16implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 17Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 18chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 19to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 20Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 21registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 22polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 23overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 24equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 25tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 26motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted   SB1178- 56 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 2of the tender is separately stated.3    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 4farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 5installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 6limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 7or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 8limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 9software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 10such equipment.11    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 12sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 13computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 14facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 15to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 16crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 17agricultural chemicals. 18    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 19also includes electrical power generation equipment used 20primarily for production agriculture. 21    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 223-55.23    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 24to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 25to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 26conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight   SB1178- 57 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 2the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 3domestic stopovers.4    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 5to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 6used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 7its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 8engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 9United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 10at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 11origination to the city of final destination on the same 12aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 13that aircraft. 14    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 15stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 16food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 17service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 18substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 19in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 20beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 21imposed.22    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 23and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 24rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 25pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 26(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow   SB1178- 58 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 2exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 3machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 4motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 5Vehicle Code.6    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 7repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 8that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 9to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 10photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.11    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 12mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 13reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 14equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 15excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 16Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 18for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 19(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 20during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2116, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).22    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines,   SB1178- 59 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 10for direct agricultural production.11    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 12meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 13Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 14Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 15Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 16racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 17provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 18under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 191995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 20January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 21such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 22ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 2395-88).24    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 25any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 26analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor   SB1178- 60 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 2executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 3hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 4identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 5the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.6    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 7property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 8effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 9has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 10by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 11Occupation Tax Act.12    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 13December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 14before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 15for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 16disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 17manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 18corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 19that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 20number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 21who reside within the declared disaster area.22    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 23December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 24before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 25the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 26including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets,   SB1178- 61 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 2water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 3purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 4facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 5State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 6Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 7in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 8disaster.9    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 10"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 11in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 12provisions of Section 3-55.13    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 141-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 15corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 16foundation, or institution that is determined by the 17Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 18educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 19corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 20foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 21for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 22schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 23useful branches of learning by methods common to public 24schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 25intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 26schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes   SB1178- 62 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 2study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 3individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 4technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 5occupation.6    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 7including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 8benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 9a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 10the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 11district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 12parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 13does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 14private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 15entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 16another individual or entity that sold the property for the 17purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 18from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 19exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.20    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 212001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 22serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 23other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 24Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 25and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 26amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is   SB1178- 63 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 2commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 3paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.4    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 5Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 6utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 7diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 8a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 9longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 10hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 11identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 12the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 13from the provisions of Section 3-55.14    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 15Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 16leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 17executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 18governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 21from the provisions of Section 3-55.22    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 232016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 24retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 25activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 26in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i)   SB1178- 64 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 2State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 3State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 4or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 5tangible personal property to be transported outside this 6State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 7State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 8adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 9Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 10with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 11this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 12(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 13manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 14purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 15from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 16all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 17consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 18the State of Illinois.19    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 20used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 21supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 22Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 23corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 24under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 25paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 26    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a   SB1178- 65 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 211-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 3constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 4only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 5transferred to the municipality without any further 6consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 7of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 8retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 9instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 10connection with the development of the municipal convention 11hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 12corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 13Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 14of Section 3-55. 15    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 16December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 17and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 18of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 19repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 20includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 21refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 22maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 23exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 24components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 25replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 26power plants, whether such engines or power plants are   SB1178- 66 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 2supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 3sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 4latex gloves, and protective films. 5    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 7qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 8modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 9or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 10Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 11repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 12have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 13accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 14The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 15commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 16service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 17129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 18through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 19transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 20(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 21replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 22hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 23approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 24Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 25operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 26Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair,   SB1178- 67 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 2regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 3of item (A).4    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 598-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 6General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 7applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 82024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 9taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 10or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 11effective date of Public Act 101-629).12    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 132026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 14    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 15who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 16paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 17    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 18construction or operation of a data center that has been 19granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 20Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 21personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 22tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 23of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 24have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 251, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 26obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer   SB1178- 68 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 2supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 3purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 4qualified. 5    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 6grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 7qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 8Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 9Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 10    For the purposes of this item (32): 11        "Data center" means a building or a series of 12    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 13    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 14    the State of Illinois. 15        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 16    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 17    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 18    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 19    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 20    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 21    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 22    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 23    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 24    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 25    systems; other cabling; and other data center 26    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate   SB1178- 69 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 2    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 3    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 4    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 5    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 6    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 7    personal property; and all other tangible personal 8    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 9    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 10    property" also includes building materials physically 11    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 12    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 13    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 14    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 15    Economic Opportunity. 16    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 173-55. 18    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 19collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 20item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 21used in this item (33): 22        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 23    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 24    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 25    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 26    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump   SB1178- 70 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 2    time of sale. 3        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 4    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 5    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 6    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 7    milk until it is ready for consumption. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 9    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 10    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 11    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 12    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 13    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 14    milk storage bags. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 16    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 17    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 18    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 19    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 20    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 21    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 22    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 23    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 24    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 25    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 26    or distributor.   SB1178- 71 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 2    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 3    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 4    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 5    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 6    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 7    manufacturer or distributor. 8    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 9the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 10Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-55.12    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 13property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 14forces of the United States who presents valid military 15identification and purchases the property using a form of 16payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 17of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 18prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 19transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 20paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 21the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 22years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 23States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 24Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 25Section 3-55. 26    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided   SB1178- 72 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 2intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 3Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 4Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 5paragraph (36) (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 63-55. 7    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 8in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 9transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 10or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 11Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 12Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 13Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 14Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 15an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 16Facilities Act. This item (37) (36) is exempt from the 17provisions of Section 3-55. 18    (38) (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 19in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) (37) is 24exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 25    (39) (36) The lease of the following tangible personal 26property:  SB1178- 73 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 2    that meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  SB1178- 74 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023. 10    (40) Tangible personal property that is (i) purchased by a 11developer who has been awarded a certificate of exemption 12under this paragraph (40) by the Department of Commerce and 13Economic Opportunity and (ii) used to rehabilitate brownfield 14or grayfield property, as defined in Section 246 of the 15Illinois Income Tax Act, after remediation has occurred. The 16Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall award 17certificates of exemption under this paragraph (40) for 18property that meets the criteria under this paragraph (40). 19This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 20(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 21Section 70-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 2275-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 23Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, 24eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 267-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995,   SB1178- 75 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 25. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 3by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 4    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)5    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 6the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 7lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 8from the tax imposed by this Act:9        (1) Farm chemicals.10        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 11    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 12    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 13    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 14    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 15    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 16    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 17    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 18    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 19    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 20    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 21    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 22    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 23    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 24    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery   SB1178- 76 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 2    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 3    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 4    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 5    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 6    stated.7        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 8    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 9    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 10    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 11    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 12    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 13    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 14    mapping systems, and other such equipment.15        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 16    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 17    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 18    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 19    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 20    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 21    diets and agricultural chemicals. 22        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 23    equipment also includes electrical power generation 24    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 25        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 26    2-70.  SB1178- 77 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 2    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 3    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 4    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 5    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 6    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 7    or resale.8        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 9    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 10    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 11    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 12    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 13    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 14    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 15    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 16    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 17    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 18    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 19    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 20    exemption under paragraph (14).21        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 22    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 23    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 24    provisions of Section 2-70.25        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 26    student organization affiliated with an elementary or   SB1178- 78 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    secondary school located in Illinois.2        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 3    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 4    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.5        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 6    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 7    the county fair.8        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 9    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 10    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 11    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 12    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 13    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 14    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 15    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 16    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 17    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 18    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 19    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 20    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 21    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 22    an active identification number issued by the Department.23        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 24    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 25    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 26    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for   SB1178- 79 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 2    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 3    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.4        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 5    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 6    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 7    institution organized and operated exclusively for 8    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 9    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 10    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 11    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 12    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 13    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 14    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 15    limited liability company is organized and operated 16    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 17    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 18    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 19    active identification number issued by the Department.20        (12) (Blank).21        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 22    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 23    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 24    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 25    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 26    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of   SB1178- 80 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 2    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 3    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 4    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 5    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 6    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 7    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 8    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 9    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 10    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 11    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 12    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 13    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 14    or not. 15        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 16    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 17    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 18    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 19    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 20    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 21    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 22    moving in interstate commerce.23        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 24    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 25    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 26    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether   SB1178- 81 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 2    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 3    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 4    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 5    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 6    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 7    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 8    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 9    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 10    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 11    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 12    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 13    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 14    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 15    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 16    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 17    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 18    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 19    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 20    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 21    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 22    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.23        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 24    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 25    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 26    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a   SB1178- 82 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 2    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 3    food or beverage function with respect to which the 4    service charge is imposed. 5        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 6    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 7    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 8    of Section 2-70. 9        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 10    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 11    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 12    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 13    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 14    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 15    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 16    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.17        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 18    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 19    government of the United States of America, or the 20    government of any foreign country, and bullion.21        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 22    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 23    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 24    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 25    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 26    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual   SB1178- 83 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 2    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 3    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 4    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.5        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 6    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 7    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 8    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 9    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 10    purchased for lease.11        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 12    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 13    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 14    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 15    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 16    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 17    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 18    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 19    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 20    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 21    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 22    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).23        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 24    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 25    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 26    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a   SB1178- 84 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    flight destined for or returning from a location or 2    locations outside the United States without regard to 3    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.4        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 5    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 6    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 7    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 8    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 9    in trade between the United States and any of its 10    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 11    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 12    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 13    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 14        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 15    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 16    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 17    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.18        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 19    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 20    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 21    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 22    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 23    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.24        (25) Except as provided in item (25-5) of this 25    Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 26    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to   SB1178- 85 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 2    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 3    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 4    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 5    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 6    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 7    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 8    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 9    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 10    titled in this State.11        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 12    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 13    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 14    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 15    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 16    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 17    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 18    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 19    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 20    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 21    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 22    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 23    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 24    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 25    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 26    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount   SB1178- 86 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 2    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 3    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 4    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 5    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 6    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 7    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 8    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 9    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 10    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 11    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 12    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 13    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 14    general rate imposed under this Act. 15        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 16    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 17    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 18    following conditions are met:19            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 20        after the later of either the issuance of the final 21        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 22        authorized approval for return to service, completion 23        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 24        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 25        required by 14 CFR 91.407;26            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in   SB1178- 87 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and2            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 3        records and provides to the Department a signed and 4        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 5        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 6        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 7        certificate must also include the name and address of 8        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 9        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 10        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 11        other information that the Department may reasonably 12        require.13        For purposes of this item (25-7):14        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 15    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 16    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 17    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 18    of the aircraft.19        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 20    registered with the Department of Transportation, 21    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 22    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 23    this State.24        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 25    Section 2-70. 26        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of   SB1178- 88 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    livestock for direct agricultural production.2        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 3    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 4    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 5    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 6    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 7    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 8    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 9    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 10    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 11    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 12    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 13    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 14    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 15    95-88).16        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 17    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 18    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 19    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 20    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 21    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 22    exemption identification number by the Department under 23    Section 1g of this Act.24        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 25    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 26    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental   SB1178- 89 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 2    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 3    of this Act.4        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 6    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 7    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 8    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 9    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 10    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 11    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 12    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 13    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 14    declared disaster area.15        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 16    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 17    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 18    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 19    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 20    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 21    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 22    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 23    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 24    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 25    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 26    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the   SB1178- 90 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.2        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 3    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 4    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 5    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.6        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 7    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 8    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 9    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 10    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 11    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 12    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 13    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 14    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 15    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 16    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 17    learning by methods common to public schools and that 18    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 19    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 20    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 21    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 22    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 23    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 24    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 25    occupation.26        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property,   SB1178- 91 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 2    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 3    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 4    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 5    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 6    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 7    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 8    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 9    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 10    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 11    another individual or entity that sold the property for 12    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 13    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 14    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.15        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 16    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 17    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 18    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 19    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 20    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 21    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 22    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 23    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 24    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 25    from the provisions of Section 2-70.26        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30,   SB1178- 92 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 2    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 3    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 4    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 5    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 6    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 7    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 8    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 9    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 10    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 11    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 12    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 13    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.14        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 15    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 16    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 17    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 18    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 19    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 20    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 21    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 22    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 23    of Section 2-70.24        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 25    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 26    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the   SB1178- 93 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 2    active tax exemption identification number by the 3    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 4    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.5        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 6    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 7    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 8    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 9    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 10    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 11    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 12    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 13    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 14    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 15    personal property to be transported outside this State and 16    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 17    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 18    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 19    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 20    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 21    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 22    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 23    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 24    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 25    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 26    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate   SB1178- 94 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 2    property outside of the State of Illinois.3        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 4    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 5    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 6    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 7    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 8    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 9    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 10    provisions of Section 2-70. 11        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 12    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 13    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 14    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 15    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 16    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 17    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 18    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 19    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 20    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 21    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 22    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 23    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 24    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 25    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 26    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution,   SB1178- 95 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    latex gloves, and protective films. 2        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 3    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 4    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 5    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 6    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 7    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 8    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 9    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 10    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 11    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 12    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 13    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 14    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 15    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 16    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 17    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 18    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 19    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 20    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 21    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 22    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 23    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 24    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 25    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 26    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of   SB1178- 96 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    item (A).2        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 3    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 4    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 5    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 6    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 7    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 8    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 9    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 10    Public Act 101-629).11        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 12    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 13    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 14    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 15    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 16    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 17    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 18    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 19    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 20    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 21    corporation in connection with the development of the 22    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 23    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 24    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 25    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 26        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December   SB1178- 97 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 2        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 3    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 4    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 5    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 6    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 7    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 8    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 9    the provisions of Section 2-70.10        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 11    construction or operation of a data center that has been 12    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 13    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 14    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 15    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 16    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 17    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 18    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 19    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 20    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 21    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 22    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 23    or leased in the original investment that would have 24    qualified. 25        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 26    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item   SB1178- 98 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 2    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 3    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 4    Illinois. 5        For the purposes of this item (44): 6            "Data center" means a building or a series of 7        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 8        working servers in one physical location or multiple 9        sites within the State of Illinois. 10            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 11        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 12        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 13        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 14        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 15        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 16        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 17        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 18        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 19        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 20        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 21        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 22        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 23        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 24        any of the foregoing, including installation, 25        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 26        qualified tangible personal property to generate,   SB1178- 99 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 2        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 3        property; and all other tangible personal property 4        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 5        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 6        property" also includes building materials physically 7        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 8        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 9        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 10        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 11        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 12        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 13    Section 2-70. 14        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 15    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 16    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 17    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 18    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 19    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 20    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 21    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 22    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 23    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 24    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 25    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 26    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes   SB1178- 100 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 2    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 3    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 4    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 5        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 6    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 7    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 8    2-70. As used in this item (46): 9        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 10    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 11    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 12    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 13    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 14    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 15    time of sale. 16        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 17    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 18    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 19    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 20    milk until it is ready for consumption. 21        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 22    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 23    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 24    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 25    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 26    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast   SB1178- 101 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    milk storage bags. 2        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 3    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 4    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 5    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 6    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 7    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 8    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 9    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 10    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 11    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 12    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 13    or distributor. 14        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 15    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 16    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 17    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 18    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 19    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 20    manufacturer or distributor. 21        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 22    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 23    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 24    provisions of Section 2-70. 25        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 26    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed   SB1178- 102 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    forces of the United States who presents valid military 2    identification and purchases the property using a form of 3    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 4    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 5    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 6    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 7    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 8    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 9    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 10    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 11    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 12    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 13        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 14    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 15    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 16    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 17    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 18    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 19    the provisions of Section 2-70. 20        (50) (49) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further 21    defined in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that 22    is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 23    than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused 24    with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that 25    has been prepared for immediate consumption). This item 26    (50) (49) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.   SB1178- 103 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1        (51) (49) Gross receipts from the lease of the 2    following tangible personal property:3            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 4        license that meets the following requirements:5                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 6            signed by the licensor and the customer;7                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 8                customer accepts the license by means of an 9                electronic signature that is verifiable and 10                can be authenticated and is attached to or 11                made part of the license will comply with this 12                requirement;13                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 14                customer electronically accepts the terms by 15                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 16                requirement;17                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 18            and use of the software;19                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 20            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 21            third party (except to a related party) without 22            the permission and continued control of the 23            licensor;24                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 25            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 26            customer loses or damages the software, or of   SB1178- 104 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 2            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 3            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 4            books and records, or supported by a notarized 5            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 6            licensor; and7                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 8            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 9            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 10            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 11            without being set forth in the license agreement; 12            and13            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 14        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 15        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 16        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 17        (52) Tangible personal property that is (i) purchased 18    by a developer who has been awarded a certificate of 19    exemption under this paragraph (52) by the Department of 20    Commerce and Economic Opportunity and (ii) used to 21    rehabilitate brownfield or grayfield property, as defined 22    in Section 246 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, after 23    remediation has occurred. The Department of Commerce and 24    Economic Opportunity shall award certificates of exemption 25    under this paragraph (52) for property that meets the 26    criteria under this paragraph (52). This paragraph is   SB1178- 105 -LRB104 08564 HLH 18616 b1    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 2(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-634, eff. 8-27-21; 3102-700, Article 70, Section 70-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, 4Article 75, Section 75-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 55-13-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, Section 65-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 76-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 8eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 9103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 108-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.